District of Columbia statutes.
29-701.06

Governing law.

The law of the District governs the internal affairs of a limited partnership and the liability of a partner for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited partnership.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(g)(2)(D), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-701.07.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 106 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.